Washington statutes.
RCW 36.87.050

Notice of hearing on report.

Notice of hearing upon the report for vacation and abandonment of a county road shall be published at least once a week for two consecutive weeks preceding the date fixed for the hearing, in the county official newspaper and a copy of the notice shall be posted for at least twenty days preceding the date fixed for hearing at each termini of the county road or portion thereof proposed to be vacated or abandoned.

[ 1963 c 4 s 36.87.050. Prior: 1937 c 187 s 51, part; RRS s 6450-51, part.]